Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-225
Certification request; Supreme Court opinion; delivery.

The written opinion of the Supreme Court stating the law governing the questions certified shall be sent by the clerk under the seal of the Supreme Court to the certifying court and to the parties.

Laws 1982, LB 724, § 7.